Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.912

Effective date—1983 c 265.

With the exception of section 19 of this act, this act shall take effect January 1, 1984.

[ 1983 c 265 s 21.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: "Section 19 of this act" is an uncodified appropriation section.